North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 3. Resignation and Termination.

§ 55A-6-30.
Resignation.

Any member may resign at any time.

The resignation of a member does not relieve the member from any obligations incurred or commitments made to the corporation prior to resignation.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-6-31.
Termination, expulsion, and suspension.

No member of a corporation may be expelled or suspended, and no membership may be terminated or suspended, except in a manner that is fair and reasonable and is carried out in good faith.

Any proceeding challenging an expulsion, suspension, or termination shall be commenced within one year after the member receives notice of the expulsion, suspension, or termination.

A member who has been expelled or suspended may be liable to the corporation for dues, assessments, or fees as a result of obligations incurred or commitments made by the member prior to expulsion or suspension.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

In view of the requirements imposed by subsection (a), former G.S. 55A-29(b), which granted appraisal rights in certain circumstances, was not brought forward.

§§ 55A-6-32 through 55A-6-39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.